Tennessee, session 114, HB2376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(h) If the possession of a firearm in a county courthouse is restricted or
prohibited pursuant to subsection (g) or § 39-17-1306, then the sheriff of the county may
provide secure storage lockers for those individuals who are carrying a firearm pursuant
to § 39-17-1351, § 39-17-1366, or § 39-17-1307 to store the firearm in separate secured,
lockable storage units at or near a designated public entrance to the building or structure
at no cost to the individual.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2376
012297
- 1 -